Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6350.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 17. Bonds issued under this act shall be are fully negotiable under the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.11102, 440.12501, and the bonds and the interest thereon on the bonds are exempt from all taxation by this state or any of its political subdivisions of this state. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6347 (request no. H02809'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.